Maryland, session 2025, SB0463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–114.
(g) (1) Subject to the applicable coverage specified under subsection (a)(1) of
this section, any portion of the common elements and the units, exclusive of improvements
and betterments installed in the units by unit owners other than the developer, damaged
or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the council of unit owners unless:
(i) The condominium is terminated;
(ii) Repair or replacement would be illegal under any State or local
health or safety statute or ordinance; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0463*

SENATE BILL 463
(iii) 80 percent of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or
assigned limited common element which will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild.
(2) (i) 1. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance
proceeds and reserves is a common expense.
2. A property insurance deductible is not a cost of repair or
replacement in excess of insurance proceeds.
(ii) If the cause of any damage to or destruction of any portion of the
condominium originates from the common elements or an event outside of the condominium
units and common elements, the council of unit owners’ property insurance deductible is a
common expense.
(iii) 1. If the cause of any damage to or destruction of any portion
of the condominium originates from a unit, the owner of the unit where the cause of the
damage or destruction originated is responsible for the council of unit owners’ property
insurance deductible not to exceed [$10,000] $20,000.
2. The council of unit owners shall inform each unit owner
annually in writing of:
A. The unit owner’s responsibility for the council of unit
owners’ property insurance deductible; and
B. The amount of the deductible.
3. The council of unit owners’ property insurance deductible
amount exceeding the [$10,000] $20,000 responsibility of the unit owner is a common
expense.
(iv) In the same manner as provided under § 11–110 of this title, the
council of unit owners may make an annual assessment against the unit owner responsible
under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph.
(3) If the damaged or destroyed portion of the condominium is not repaired
or replaced:
(i) The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common
elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the
remainder of the condominium;
(ii) The insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited
common elements which are not rebuilt shall be distributed to the owners of those units
and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were assigned; and

SENATE BILL 463 3
(iii) The remainder of the proceeds shall be distributed to all the unit
owners in proportion to their percentage interest in the common elements.
(4) (i) If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s entire
common element interest, votes in the council of unit owners, and common expense liability
are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under §
11–112 of this title, and the council of unit owners promptly shall prepare, execute, and
record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, § 11–123 of
this title governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies of property and casualty insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in the State to a
condominium council of unit owners as required under § 11–114 of the Real Property Article
on or after October 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.